Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PUBLIC HOUSING REHABILITATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $100,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for transfer to the housing development fund to finance the costs of rehabilitation to preserve public housing under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.202, subdivision 3a. For purposes of this section, "public housing" means housing for low-income persons and households financed by the federal government and publicly owned. The agency may give priority to proposals that maximize federal or local resources to finance the capital costs and requests that prioritize health, safety, and energy improvements. The priority in Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.202, subdivision 3a, for projects to increase the supply of affordable housing and the restrictions of Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.202, subdivision 7, do not apply to this appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $100,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end